North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-17 Industrial Commission
54-17-34.
Definitions.

As used in sections 54-17-34 through 54-17-34.5:

“First-time farmer” means an individual who is a North Dakota resident who has not at any time had any direct or indirect ownership interest in substantial farmland in the operation of which the individual materially participated, who will be the principal user of the farmland, and who will materially and substantially participate on the farm of which the land is a part in the operation of the farm.

“Substantial farmland” means any parcel of land unless the parcel is smaller than thirty percent of the median size of a farm in the county in which the parcel is located.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 2; 2009, ch. 472, §
1.

54-17-34.1.
Farm finance program.

Acting as the farm finance agency, the industrial commission may establish the first-time farmer finance program to encourage first-time farmers to enter into and remain in the livelihood of agriculture and to provide first-time farmers a source of financing at favorable rates and terms generally not available to them. The first-time farmer finance program is established to allow first-time farmers to utilize the tax-exempt financing provided for in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and any amended regulations adopted thereunder.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 3.

54-17-34.2.
First-time farmer participation.

The first-time farmer finance program is limited as required by applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any regulations adopted thereunder, as amended, and under the first-time farmer finance program:

Financing may not be made to individuals with a net worth that exceeds the net worth requirement of the beginning farmer revolving loan program administered by the Bank of North Dakota and established by loan policy; and

Financing may only be made to first-time farmers for the acquisition of land in the state of North Dakota, livestock, farm improvements, and equipment to be used for farming purposes and may not exceed an amount established under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 4; 2009, ch. 472, § 2.

54-17-34.3.
Financing.

Financing may be accomplished by the issuance of evidences of indebtedness by the industrial commission acting as the farm finance agency and the entering into of a financing agreement between the industrial commission acting as the farm finance agency and lenders or individuals. Any financing agreement entered into between the industrial commission and any lender or individual is payable as to principal and interest only from the payments made thereon by the first-time farmer, and the financing agreement and any evidence of indebtedness may not constitute a debt of the state of North Dakota or any agency or instrumentality thereof within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limit.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 5.

54-17-34.4.
Policies.

Before exercising any of its powers as the farm finance agency pursuant to subsection 2 of section 54-17-09, the industrial commission shall adopt policies and rules relating to any or all of the following:

Procedures and documentation for the submission of requests for financing; and

Provisions necessary for compliance with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any regulations adopted thereunder, as amended.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 6.

54-17-34.5.
Financing exempt from taxation — Exception.

Evidences of indebtedness issued under the provisions of the first-time farmer finance program, and the interest therefrom, is exempt from any taxes of the state, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 449, § 7.

54-17-35.
Governmental public purpose — Electricity transmission export constraint priority.

The legislative assembly finds and declares that it is an essential governmental function and public purpose to assist with the removal of electrical transmission export constraints and to assist with the upgrading and expansion of the region’s electrical transmission grid in order to facilitate the development of the state’s abundant natural resources for export to the region’s consumers. The industrial commission shall give priority to those projects, processes, or activities that assist with the resolution of electricity transmission export constraints in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 471, § 1.

54-17-36.
Lease of municipal waterworks and sewage systems.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state, acting by and through its industrial commission, may enter agreements to lease all or part of, or an undivided or other interest in, the plant or equipment of any waterworks, mains, or water distribution system and any property related thereto pursuant to subsection 5 of section 40-33-01, subsection 12 of section 61-24.5-09, or subsection 23 of section 61-35-12 or any sewage system and all related property for the collection, treatment, purification, and disposal in a sanitary manner of sewage pursuant to section 40-34-19 or subsection 23 of section 61-35-12 to or from a municipality or other political subdivision or agency of the state, or to or from any person, for such compensation and upon such terms and conditions as the parties under such agreement may stipulate. For the purposes of this section, such agreements include any lease, sublease, purchase agreement, lease-purchase agreement, installment purchase agreement, leaseback agreement, or other contract, agreement, instrument, or arrangement pursuant to which any rights, interests, or other property are transferred to, by, or from any party to, by, or from one or more parties, and any related documents entered or to be entered, including any operating agreement, service agreement, indemnity agreement, participation agreement, loan agreement, or payment undertaking agreement. Any lease obligation entered under this section is payable solely from revenues to be derived by the state or any agency or institution of the state from the ownership, sale, lease, disposition, and operation of the plant or equipment of any waterworks, mains, or water distribution system and any property related thereto or sewage systems and all related property for the collection, treatment, purification, and disposal in a sanitary manner of sewage; any funds or investments permitted under state law, and any earnings thereon, to the extent pledged therefor; revenues to be derived by the state from any support and operating agreement, service agreement, or any other agreement relating to the waterworks, mains, and water distribution system or sewage system; funds, if any, appropriated annually by the legislative assembly; and income or proceeds from any collateral pledged or provided therefor. A lease obligation entered under this section does not constitute an indebtedness of the industrial commission, the state, or any agency or officer or agent thereof, or a pledge of the full faith and credit or unlimited taxing resources of the industrial commission, the state, or any agency or officer or agent thereof. The industrial commission may authorize the public finance authority or another agency or institution of the state to do and perform any acts and things authorized by this section, including making, entering, and enforcing all contracts or agreements necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 342, § 12; 2005, ch. 89, § 32.

54-17-37.
Tribal-state guaranty program — Continuing appropriation.

Expired under S.L. 2007, ch. 461, §
1.

54-17-38.
Biomass incentive and research program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 521, § 6.

54-17-39.
Biomass incentive and research fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 521, § 6.

54-17-40.
Housing incentive fund — Continuing appropriation — Report to budget section.

The housing incentive fund is created as a special revolving fund at the Bank of North Dakota. The housing finance agency may direct disbursements from the fund and a continuing appropriation from the fund is provided for that purpose.

After a public hearing, the housing finance agency shall create an annual allocation plan for the distribution of the fund as authorized under subsection 3. At least ten percent of the fund must be used to assist developing communities to address an unmet housing need or alleviate a housing shortage. At least ten percent of the fund must be made available to prevent homelessness as authorized by subdivision d of subsection 3.

The annual allocation plan must give priority to provide housing for individuals and families of low or moderate income. For purposes of this priority, eligible income limits are determined as a percentage of median family income as published in the most recent federal register notice. Under this priority, the annual allocation plan must give preference to projects that benefit households with the lowest income and to projects that have rent restrictions at or below department of housing and urban development published federal fair market rents or department of housing and urban development section 8 payment standards.

The housing finance agency shall adopt guidelines for the fund so as to address unmet housing needs in this state. Assistance from the fund may be used solely for:

New construction, rehabilitation, preservation, or acquisition of a multifamily housing project;

Gap assistance, matching funds, and accessibility improvements;

Assistance that does not exceed the amount necessary to qualify for a loan using underwriting standards acceptable for secondary market financing or to make the project feasible; and

Rental assistance, emergency assistance, barrier mitigation, or targeted supportive services designated to prevent homelessness.

Eligible recipients include units of local, state, and tribal government; local and tribal housing authorities; community action agencies; regional planning councils; and nonprofit organizations and for-profit developers of multifamily housing. Individuals may not receive direct assistance from the fund.

Except for subdivision d of subsection 3, assistance is subject to repayment or recapture under the guidelines adopted by the housing finance agency. Any assistance that is repaid or recaptured must be deposited in the fund and is appropriated on a continuing basis for the purposes of this section.

The agency may collect a reasonable administrative fee from the fund, project developers, applicants, or grant recipients. The origination fee assessed to grant recipients may not exceed five percent of the project award.

Upon request, the housing finance agency shall report to the industrial commission regarding the activities of the housing incentive fund.

At least once per biennium, the housing finance agency shall provide a report to the budget section of the legislative management regarding the activities of the housing incentive fund.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 398, § 2; 2013, ch. 406, § 2; 2013, ch. 45, § 23; 2015, ch. 14, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 39, § 19, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 14, § 21, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 42, § 26, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 14, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 23 of chapter 45, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 406, S.L. 2013 became effective May 7, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 7 of chapter 406, S.L. 2013.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 17, of chapter 14, S.L. 2015, was to extend the expiration date from June 30, 2015 to June 30, 2017.

The 2013 amendment of this section extended the expiration date from June 30, 2013 to June 30, 2015.

Section 54-17-40 was amended 2 times by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. The amendment made in section 23 of chapter 45, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2014 was incorrectly made to the section as set to expire June 30, 2013, so the section is amended as provided in section 2 of chapter 406, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1029.

54-17-41.
Report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 398, § 2; 2013, ch. 406, § 3; 2015, ch. 14, § 18, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 39, § 23, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 18, of chapter 14, S.L. 2015, was to extend the expiration date from June 30, 2015 to June 30, 2017.

54-17-42.
Report to legislative assembly or budget section on the fiscal impact of certain actions of the industrial commission.

If any order, regulation, or policy of the industrial commission to implement the provisions of chapter 38-08, excluding spacing unit orders, has a fiscal effect or estimated fiscal effect on the state in excess of twenty million dollars in a biennium, the industrial commission shall report to the legislative assembly when in session and otherwise to the budget section of the legislative management on the fiscal impact of the effect of the action on state revenues and expenditures, including any effect on the funds of the industrial commission.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 378, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 378, S.L. 2015 provides, “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION

. This Act applies retroactively to actions of the industrial commission made after July 31, 2013, and applies specifically to the orders of the industrial commission on flaring. The industrial commission shall report on the fiscal impacts of past orders within ninety days of the effective date of this Act.”